src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
!  --------------------
!! The English language adjectives compare.

LEXICON Comparisons
+A+pos:0        Cases   ;
+A+cmp:er       Cases   ;
+A+sup:est      Cases   ;

LEXICON A-case_expensive__adj
+A: # ; !FIXME
LEXICON A_/bad__adj
+A: # ; !FIXME
LEXICON A_/good__adj
+A: # ; !FIXME
LEXICON A_broad/__adj
+A: # ; !FIXME
LEXICON A_f/ar__adj
+A: # ; !FIXME
LEXICON A_fun/__adj
+A: # ; !FIXME
LEXICON A_handsome/__adj
+A: # ; !FIXME

LEXICON A_happ/y__adj
+A+Pos: # ; !FIXME
+A+Comp:%^Y2I%>er # ;
+A+Superl:%^Y2I%>est # ;


LEXICON A_big/__adj
!A_flat/__adj
!A_dim/__adj
!A_drab/__adj
!A_glad/__adj
!A_hot/__adj
!A_thin/__adj
+A+Pos: # ; !FIXME
+A+Comp:%^C2CC%>er # ; 
+A+Superl:%^C2CC%>est # ; 

LEXICON A_long/__adj
+A+Pos: # ; 
+A+Comp:%>er # ;
+A+Superl:%>est # ;
LEXICON A_lovel/y__adj
+A+Pos: # ; !FIXME
+A+Comp:%^Y2I%>er # ;
+A+Superl:%^Y2I%>est # ;

LEXICON A_mine__adj
+A: # ; !FIXME
LEXICON A_nice/__adj
+A: # ; !FIXME
LEXICON A_sh/y__adj
+A: # ; !FIXME
LEXICON A_sly/__adj
+A: # ; !FIXME

LEXICON A_common/__adj
+A: # ; !FIXME take independent comparison and dependent
+A+Pos: # ;
+A+Comp:%>r # ;
+A+Superl:%>st # ;

LEXICON A_expensive__adj
+A: # ; !FIXME take independent	comparison alone
LEXICON	A_nice__adj
+A+Pos: # ;
+A+Comp:%>r # ;
+A+Superl:%>st # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
