src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives
adjective    Comparisons   ;
    abstract:abstract A_common/__adj ;
    alimentary:alimentary A_expensive__adj ;
    alive:alive A_handsome/__adj ;
    Ancient% Greek:Ancient% Greek A-case_expensive__adj ;
    Arabic:Arabic A-case_expensive__adj ;
    atomic:atomic A_expensive__adj ;
    Australian:Australian A-case_expensive__adj ;
    aware:aware A_handsome/__adj ;
    awful:awful A_common/__adj ;
    bad: A_/bad__adj ;
    Bavarian:Bavarian A-case_expensive__adj ;
    beige:beige A_nice/__adj ;
    big:big A_big/__adj ;
    bitter:bitter A_common/__adj ;
    black:black A_long/__adj ;
    blatant:blatant A_common/__adj ;
    blind:blind A_long/__adj ;
    blue:blue A_nice/__adj ;
    brave:brave A_nice/__adj ;
    brazen:brazen A_expensive__adj ;
    bright:bright A_long/__adj ;
    brittle:brittle A_nice/__adj ;
    broad:broad A_broad/__adj ;
    brunette:brunette A_nice/__adj ;
    Buddhist:Buddhist A-case_expensive__adj ;
    bulky:bulky A_happ/y__adj ;
    Byzantine:Byzantine A-case_expensive__adj ;
    Caribbean:Caribbean A-case_expensive__adj ;
    Celtic-speaking:Celtic-speaking A-case_expensive__adj ;
    cheap:cheap A_long/__adj ;
    chilly:chilly A_happ/y__adj ;
    civil:civil A_common/__adj ;
    classic:classic A_expensive__adj ;
    clear:clear A_long/__adj ;
    close:close A_nice/__adj ;
    cold:cold A_long/__adj ;
    Colombian:Colombian A-case_expensive__adj ;
    common:common A_common/__adj ;
    confusing:confusing A_expensive__adj ;
    costly:costly A_happ/y__adj ;
    crazy:crazy A_happ/y__adj ;
    crude:crude A_nice/__adj ;
    customary:customary A_expensive__adj ;
    Czech:Czech A-case_expensive__adj ;
    dark:dark A_long/__adj ;
    deaf:deaf A_long/__adj ;
    deep:deep A_long/__adj ;
    dense:dense A_nice/__adj ;
    dilettante:dilettante A_expensive__adj ;
    dim:dim A_big/__adj ;
    dirty:dirty A_happ/y__adj ;
    discreet:discreet A_common/__adj ;
    drab:drab A_big/__adj ;
    dusty:dusty A_happ/y__adj ;
    earthly:earthly A_happ/y__adj ;
    easy:easy A_happ/y__adj ;
    ecclesiastical:ecclesiastical A_expensive__adj ;
    Egyptian:Egyptian A-case_expensive__adj ;
    exact:exact A_common/__adj ;
    excess:excess A_expensive__adj ;
    extreme:extreme A_handsome/__adj ;
    fair:fair A_long/__adj ;
    Falangist:Falangist A-case_expensive__adj ;
    false:false A_nice/__adj ;
    fancy:fancy A_happ/y__adj ;
    far:f A_f/ar__adj ;
    fat:fat A_big/__adj ;
    federal:federal A_expensive__adj ;
    feeble:feeble A_nice/__adj ;
    fierce:fierce A_nice/__adj ;
    fine:fine A_nice/__adj ;
    Finno-Urgic% speaking:Finno-Urgic% speaking A-case_expensive__adj ;
    firm:firm A_long/__adj ;
    fit:fit A_big/__adj ;
    flat:flat A_big/__adj ;
    fragile:fragile A_handsome/__adj ;
    free:free A_nice/__adj ;
    fresh:fresh A_long/__adj ;
    friendly:friendly A_happ/y__adj ;
    frivolous:frivolous A_expensive__adj ;
    fun:fun A_fun/__adj ;
    Gaelic:Gaelic A-case_expensive__adj ;
    gangly:gangly A_happ/y__adj ;
    gentle:gentle A_nice/__adj ;
    glad:glad A_big/__adj ;
    gloomy:gloomy A_happ/y__adj ;
    glum:glum A_big/__adj ;
    good: A_/good__adj ;
    Gothic:Gothic A-case_expensive__adj ;
    grave:grave A_nice/__adj ;
    gray:gray A_sly/__adj ;
    great:great A_long/__adj ;
    grey:grey A_sly/__adj ;
    grim:grim A_big/__adj ;
    gross:gross A_long/__adj ;
    grumpy:grumpy A_happ/y__adj ;
    hairy:hairy A_happ/y__adj ;
    handsome:handsome A_handsome/__adj ;
    happy:happy A_happ/y__adj ;
    hard:hard A_long/__adj ;
    hard-working:hard-working A_expensive__adj ;
    heavy:heavy A_happ/y__adj ;
    high:high A_long/__adj ;
    his:his A_mine__adj ;
    homely:homely A_happ/y__adj ;
    Honduran:Honduran A-case_expensive__adj ;
    hot:hot A_big/__adj ;
    human:human A_common/__adj ;
    humble:humble A_nice/__adj ;
    husky:husky A_happ/y__adj ;
    Icelandic:Icelandic A-case_expensive__adj ;
    immense:immense A_expensive__adj ;
    immortal:immortal A_common/__adj ;
    indifferent:indifferent A_expensive__adj ;
    intact:intact A_common/__adj ;
    intended:intended A_expensive__adj ;
    Iranian:Iranian A-case_expensive__adj ;
    irregular:irregular A_common/__adj ;
    Italian:Italian A-case_expensive__adj ;
    Jewish:Jewish A-case_expensive__adj ;
    just:just A_long/__adj ;
    large:large A_nice/__adj ;
    last:last A_expensive__adj ;
    late:late A_nice/__adj ;
    Latvian:Latvian A-case_expensive__adj ;
    lean:lean A_long/__adj ;
    lengthy:lengthy A_happ/y__adj ;
    likely:likely A_lovel/y__adj ;
    lively:lively A_lovel/y__adj ;
    long:long A_long/__adj ;
    lovely:lovely A_happ/y__adj ;
    low:low A_long/__adj ;
    lumbering:lumbering A_expensive__adj ;
    mad:mad A_big/__adj ;
    Maltese:Maltese A-case_expensive__adj ;
    mellow:mellow A_common/__adj ;
    methodical:methodical A_expensive__adj ;
    mine:mine A_mine__adj ;
    modern:modern A_common/__adj ;
    modest:modest A_common/__adj ;
    moody:moody A_happ/y__adj ;
    moral:moral A_common/__adj ;
    Moroccan:Moroccan A-case_expensive__adj ;
    naïve:naïve A_nice/__adj ;
    narrative:narrative A_expensive__adj ;
    near:near A_long/__adj ;
    net:net A_big/__adj ;
    nice:nice A_nice/__adj ;
    Nigerian:Nigerian A-case_expensive__adj ;
    noble:noble A_nice/__adj ;
    noisy:noisy A_happ/y__adj ;
    not% :not%  A_/bad__adj ;
    nude:nude A_nice/__adj ;
    officious:officious A_expensive__adj ;
    old:old A_long/__adj ;
    ours:ours A_mine__adj ;
    pale:pale A_handsome/__adj ;
    Palestinian:Palestinian A-case_expensive__adj ;
    paltry:paltry A_expensive__adj ;
    Peruvian:Peruvian A-case_expensive__adj ;
    pioneering:pioneering A_expensive__adj ;
    preventive:preventive A_expensive__adj ;
    primeval:primeval A_long/__adj ;
    profound:profound A_common/__adj ;
    quiet:quiet A_long/__adj ;
    random:random A_common/__adj ;
    rapid:rapid A_common/__adj ;
    rare:rare A_nice/__adj ;
    ready-cooked:ready-cooked A_expensive__adj ;
    real:real A_common/__adj ;
    red:red A_big/__adj ;
    right:right A_common/__adj ;
    right-hand:right-hand A_expensive__adj ;
    ripe:ripe A_handsome/__adj ;
    robust:robust A_common/__adj ;
    Romanian-speaking:Romanian-speaking A-case_expensive__adj ;
    roomy:roomy A_happ/y__adj ;
    round:round A_long/__adj ;
    sad:sad A_big/__adj ;
    safe:safe A_nice/__adj ;
    Scandinavian:Scandinavian A-case_expensive__adj ;
    scrubby:scrubby A_happ/y__adj ;
    sensationalistic:sensationalistic A_expensive__adj ;
    serious:serious A_common/__adj ;
    severe:severe A_handsome/__adj ;
    shiny:shiny A_happ/y__adj ;
    shy:sh A_sh/y__adj ;
    sick:sick A_long/__adj ;
    silent:silent A_common/__adj ;
    sincere:sincere A_nice/__adj ;
    skimpy:skimpy A_happ/y__adj ;
    slim:slim A_big/__adj ;
    sloppy:sloppy A_happ/y__adj ;
    sl:sl A_sh/y__adj ;
    smooth:smooth A_long/__adj ;
    snug:snug A_big/__adj ;
    some:some A_expensive__adj ;
    sour:sour A_long/__adj ;
    spare:spare A_handsome/__adj ;
    stocky:stocky A_happ/y__adj ;
    straight:straight A_common/__adj ;
    strange:strange A_nice/__adj ;
    strict:strict A_common/__adj ;
    sugar-free:sugar-free A_expensive__adj ;
    sure:sure A_nice/__adj ;
    Swedish:Swedish A-case_expensive__adj ;
    sweet:sweet A_long/__adj ;
    theirs:theirs A_mine__adj ;
    thin:thin A_big/__adj ;
    timely:timely A_lovel/y__adj ;
    true:true A_nice/__adj ;
    trustworthy:trustworthy A_expensive__adj ;
    Ukrainian:Ukrainian A-case_expensive__adj ;
    uneasy:uneasy A_happ/y__adj ;
    unlikely:unlikely A_lovel/y__adj ;
    unripe:unripe A_handsome/__adj ;
    unworthy:unworthy A_expensive__adj ;
    upward:upward A_common/__adj ;
    vast:vast A_long/__adj ;
    wealthy:wealthy A_happ/y__adj ;
    white:white A_nice/__adj ;
    wild:wild A_long/__adj ;
    wise:wise A_nice/__adj ;
    wrong:wrong A_common/__adj ;
    yours:yours A_mine__adj ;
